Illinois, session 104th, SB676.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 14-101 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/14-101)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 14-101)7    Sec. 14-101. Creation of system. A retirement and and 8benefit system is created to provide retirement annuities and 9other benefits for employees of the State of Illinois. The 10system shall be known as the "State Employees' Retirement 11System of Illinois". By such name all its business shall be 12transacted and its cash and other property held in trust for 13the purposes of this Article.14(Source: P.A. 80-841.)